Hawaii statutes.
§255D-4 Authority to enter agreement. The
department with the concurrence of the legislature may enter into the
streamlined sales and use tax agreement with one or more states to simplify and
modernize sales and use tax administration to substantially reduce the burden
of tax compliance for all sellers and for all types of commerce. In
furtherance of the agreement, the department may act jointly with other states
that are members of the agreement to establish standards for certification of a
certified service provider and certified automated system and establish
performance standards for multistate sellers. The department may take other
actions reasonably required to implement this section. Other actions
authorized by this section include but are not limited to the adoption of rules
not subject to chapter 91 and the joint procurement not subject to chapter
103D, with other member states, of goods and services in furtherance of the
cooperative agreement. The department, or the department's designee, may
represent this State before the other states that are signatories to the
agreement. [L 2003, c 173, pt of §2; am L 2004, c 216, §31; am L 2005, c 22,
§8; am L Sp 2005, c 3, §4]

Previous
Vol04_Ch0201-0257
Next